Utah statutes.
63C-11-315.   Exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to:

(1)  any amateur contest or exhibition of unarmed combat conducted by or participated in exclusively by:

(a)  a school accredited by the Utah Board of Education;

(b)  a college or university accredited by the United States Department of Education; or

(c)  any association or organization of a school, college, or university described in Subsections (1)(a) and (b), when each participant in the contests or exhibitions is a bona fide student in the school, college, or university;

(2)  any contest or exhibition of unarmed combat conducted in accordance with the standards and regulations of USA Boxing, Inc.; or

(3)  a white-collar contest.

